test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-alomanw19_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - alomanõ: # Noun (19) alomanõ 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     alomanõ+N+Sg+Nom: alomanõ
     alomanõ+N+Sg+Gen: alomadsõ
     alomanõ+N+Sg+Par: alomast
     alomanõ+N+Sg+Ill: alomastõ
     alomanõ+N+Sg+Ine: [alomadsõn, alomadsõh, alomadsõhn]
     alomanõ+N+Sg+Ela: alomadsõst
     alomanõ+N+Sg+All: alomadsõlõ
     alomanõ+N+Sg+Ade: alomadsõl
     alomanõ+N+Sg+Abl: alomadsõlt
     alomanõ+N+Sg+Tra: alomadsõs
     alomanõ+N+Sg+Ter: alomadsõniq
     alomanõ+N+Sg+Abe: alomadsõldaq
     alomanõ+N+Sg+Com: alomadsõgaq
     alomanõ+N+Pl+Nom: alomadsõq
     alomanõ+N+Pl+Gen: [alomaidsi, alomastõ]
     alomanõ+N+Pl+Par: alomaidsi
     alomanõ+N+Pl+Ill: [alomaidsihe, alomaidsi, alomaidsidõ]
     alomanõ+N+Pl+Ine: [alomaidsin, alomaidsih, alomaidsihn, alomastõn, alomastõh, alomastõhn]
     alomanõ+N+Pl+Ela: [alomaidsist, alomastõst]
     alomanõ+N+Pl+All: [alomaidsilõ, alomastõlõ]
     alomanõ+N+Pl+Ade: [alomaidsil, alomastõl]
     alomanõ+N+Pl+Abl: [alomaidsilt, alomastõlt]
     alomanõ+N+Pl+Tra: [alomaidsis, alomastõs]
     alomanõ+N+Pl+Ter: [alomaidsiniq, alomastõniq]
     alomanõ+N+Pl+Abe: [alomaidsildaq, alomastõldaq]
     alomanõ+N+Pl+Com: [alomaidsigaq, alomastõgaq]
